Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1

General Provisions

57-9-101. Destruction of liquor and paraphernalia.

It is the duty of all sheriffs and deputy sheriffs of the different counties of the state and the police officers of each incorporated city and town to search for, seize and capture all illicit distilleries, stills and worms, distilling and fermenting equipment and apparatus and other paraphernalia connected therewith, or used or to be used in the illicit manufacture of intoxicating liquors; raw materials and substances connected with or to be used in the illicit manufacture of intoxicating liquors; and containers connected with or used in the packaging of illicitly manufactured intoxicating liquors.

It is the duty of such officer or officers to destroy any and all whiskey, beer, or other intoxicants found at or near such distilleries or stills except with respect to intoxicating liquors upon which federal tax has been paid as provided in § 57-9-115.

It is the duty of such officer or officers capturing such distilleries, stills, distilling and fermenting equipment and apparatus and other paraphernalia, to summarily destroy and render useless such property. Any intoxicants or other articles of personal property destroyed under authority of this section shall be destroyed in the presence of at least two (2) credible witnesses. Within five (5) days after such destruction, the officer destroying such intoxicants or other articles shall file a written statement, listing all items destroyed, signed by the officer destroying and the witness or witnesses thereto, with the circuit or criminal court clerk of the county where seized and, in addition, shall file a copy thereof with the alcoholic beverage commission.

The reference to sheriffs and deputy sheriffs in this section shall also include constables in counties of this state having a population of:

not less than nor more than

3,700 4,700

6,000 7,800

8,400 8,500

8,535 8,540

9,200 9,570

10,770 10,780

11,512 11,550

11,700 11,900

12,000 13,000

14,500 14,600

15,300 15,500

15,750 16,000

17,000 17,350

18,000 18,200

18,300 18,900

19,000 19,100

21,000 21,500

21,600 22,300

23,200 23,350

23,355 23,391

23,391 23,450

23,500 23,750

24,000 24,255

25,600 27,500

27,900 28,000

28,555 28,600

29,250 31,250

31,260 33,000

33,700 34,000

35,480 41,800

41,900 50,000

57,550 59,400

59,500 60,050

60,600 62,000

64,000 65,000

101,000 118,400

118,700 200,000

according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and Fentress County and Hamblen County.

Acts 1919, ch. 20, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b18; Code 1932, § 11239; Acts 1969, ch. 160, § 3; 1969, ch. 319, §§ 3, 4; 1970, ch. 456, § 1; 1970, ch. 496, § 1; 1970, ch. 588, §§ 1, 2; 1971, ch. 53, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 584, § 1; 1972, ch. 672, § 1; 1973, ch. 389, § 1; 1974, ch. 631, §§ 1, 2; Private Acts 1976, ch. 242, § 1; Private Acts 1976, ch. 293; Acts 1977, ch. 239, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-601; Acts 1982, ch. 881, § 1; 1991, ch. 9, § 8; 1992, ch. 973, § 6; Private Acts 1994, ch. 191, § 4; Acts 1996, ch. 553, § 5; 1996, ch. 753, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 1996, ch. 753, § 1 abolished the office of constable, effective in any county having a population of not less than thirty-one thousand one hundred (31,100) nor more than thirty-one thousand four hundred (31,400) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, upon adoption of a resolution by July 15, 1996, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of such county. The section as set out above reflects the amendment by ch. 753.

Cross-References. Constables, counties in which office abolished, §8-10-101.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707.

57-9-102. Arrest of persons implicated in manufacture.

It shall be the duty of such officer to make arrests of any and all persons implicated, aiding or abetting in the manufacture of intoxicating liquors, and take them before the proper officials and have them tried upon such charge.

Acts 1919, ch. 20, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b20; Code 1932, § 11241; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-603.

57-9-103. Officers to take into possession intoxicating liquors held or transported illegally.

All sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, and police officers of the state are hereby empowered and required to take into possession any intoxicating liquors, including wine, ale, and beer, which have been received by, or are in possession of, or are being transported by, any person in violation of any law of this state; provided, however, that the reference to “sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, and police officers” in this section also includes “constables” in those counties of this state enumerated in §57-9-101.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b1; Code 1932, § 11224; Acts 1969, ch. 160, § 3; 1969, ch. 319, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-604.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

57-9-104. Officers to file written statement about intoxicants taken.

Every such officer so taking into possession any such intoxicating liquors shall, within five (5) days after so doing, file with the circuit or criminal court clerk of the county wherein the same was taken into possession, a written statement showing the kind and quantity of intoxicating liquors so taken, and the name or names of the person from whom the same was taken, if the name of such person be known to such officer.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b2; Code 1932, § 11225; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-605.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

57-9-105. Court having jurisdiction.

In any county having more than one (1) circuit court, or both a circuit court and a criminal court, the court in such county having the jurisdiction of the indictment and trial of offenses against the liquor laws of this state shall have exclusive jurisdiction of all matters relating to the seizure and destruction of intoxicating liquors as provided in this part, and where reference is made to the circuit court or criminal court clerk it shall be deemed to refer to the county clerk of the county having such jurisdiction, and the statements required of the sheriff shall be made to the clerk or the judge of such court.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b13; Code 1932, § 11236; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-606.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 26, 28.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

57-9-106. Delivery of seized liquor to sheriff.

Every officer, other than the sheriff, taking into possession intoxicating liquors as provided for in §57-9-103, shall within five (5) days after so doing, deliver the intoxicating liquors to the sheriff of the county wherein the same was taken into possession, and the sheriff shall execute to the officer a receipt for same in writing showing the kind and quantity of intoxicating liquors so delivered, and the name or names of the person from whom the intoxicating liquors were taken, if such name be known to the officer.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b3; Code 1932, § 11226; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-607.

57-9-107. Sheriff to keep intoxicants until otherwise ordered by court.

The sheriff shall safely keep in possession all intoxicating liquors, either taken by the sheriff as provided in §57-9-103 or delivered to the sheriff as provided in §57-9-106 until ordered to dispose of same by the court as hereinafter provided.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b4; Code 1932, § 11227; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-608.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

57-9-108. Sheriff's statement of intoxicants held.

At each term of the circuit or criminal court, the sheriff shall deliver to the circuit or criminal court judge holding same a written statement showing all intoxicating liquors in the sheriff's possession, setting forth the kind and quantity of same and the name of the person from whom the same have been taken, if such name is known to the sheriff, and where the name of such person is unknown to the sheriff, such statement shall set out the date of the posting of the notice required by §57-9-110.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b7; Code 1932, § 11230; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-609.

57-9-109. Notice to owners.

The filing of the statement, set out in §57-9-104, shall be the only notice that is necessary to be given to the person from whom such liquors were taken, where the person resides within the jurisdiction of the court or where the person was arrested at the time of the seizure of such liquors.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b5; Code 1932, § 11228; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-610.

57-9-110. Notice when name of owner unknown.

If the name of the person transporting, receiving or possessing intoxicating liquors which have been seized in accordance with this part be unknown to the sheriff or other officer seizing the same, then, in that event, the sheriff or other officer taking possession of the same shall so certify in the statement required to be filed by §57-9-104, and the clerk of such circuit or criminal court shall give notice to whom it may concern by notice posted at the courthouse door of the county within which such liquors were seized, setting forth in substance that such liquors have been seized in accordance with this part, and notifying all persons claiming same to do so within thirty (30) days from the date of the posting of such notice, and that if they fail to do so, they will forfeit all right in and to the same and that condemnation and forfeiture thereof will be in the nature of proceedings in rem.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b6; Code 1932, § 11229; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-611.

57-9-111. Claimants of liquor — Petition.

All persons claiming any interest in intoxicating liquors seized in accordance with this part shall do so by petition, which petition shall be filed in the circuit or criminal court of the county in which such liquors were seized, within ten (10) days after the filing of the statement showing the seizure thereof required in §57-9-104; provided, however, that persons for whom advertisement is made by notice as herein required may file such petition within the time set out in such notice. It shall be the duty of the sheriff to ascertain what notices have been posted by the clerk in accordance with this part and make return thereof to the court as hereinbefore provided.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b8; Code 1932, § 11231; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-612.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Right to Trial by Jury in a Summary Proceeding, 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 363.

57-9-112. Answer to petition claiming ownership.

It shall be the duty of the district attorney general to investigate and file answer to any petition alleging ownership of or any interest in any intoxicating liquors seized under this part, and to represent the state upon the hearing of such petition.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b12; Code 1932, § 11235; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-613.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

57-9-113. Petition claiming ownership tried in summary manner.

The hearing of such petition shall be had in a summary manner, before the court sitting without a jury.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 14; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b14; mod. Code 1932, § 11237; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-614.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Right to Trial by Jury in a Summary Proceeding, 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 363.

57-9-114. Determination of claims to liquor.

Where any person claims an interest in any liquor seized in accordance with this part, the court shall hear and determine the question of the right of such person so claiming an interest in such liquors; but no person shall be deemed to have any property right in any intoxicating liquors transported, received, or possessed in violation of the laws of this state; and if the court, upon the hearing of any petition alleging ownership of, or an interest in intoxicating liquors, shall ascertain that the same have been received, transported or possessed in violation of any law of this state, the court shall direct the sale or destruction thereof by the sheriff as set out in §§57-9-115 —57-9-119.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b10; Code 1932, § 11233; Acts 1947, ch. 127, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 11233; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-615.

57-9-115. Delivery of seized liquor to alcoholic beverage commission — Sale.

Any intoxicating liquors seized in accordance with this part, upon which federal tax has been paid, shall be turned over to the alcoholic beverage commission for public sale by the commissioner of general services as contraband in accordance with part 2 of this chapter.

The commission, at the request of the district attorney general, shall withhold from sale and make available to the court on the day of trial, a sufficient amount of such intoxicating liquor for use as evidence and proof of the offense contained in the indictment of any person under prosecution in connection therewith.

It shall be the duty of the sheriff to notify the commission in writing within ten (10) days after the seizure of such liquors, describing the brands and quantity thereof, and to turn over such liquors to the commission at the time and place designated by the commission.

It shall be the responsibility of the commission to provide transportation and storage for such liquors.

In the event the commission calls upon the sheriff to transport such liquors, all expenses incurred by the sheriff in the transportation of such liquors shall be borne by the commission, and the sheriff shall be allowed the same mileage fee as for transporting prisoners, in addition to the other actual cost of transportation.

All money received from the sale of such liquors shall be deposited in the general fund of the state treasury; provided, that, in the case of all liquor captured or confiscated by a police officer of any incorporated municipality, the funds derived from the sale of such liquor, less ten percent (10%) to be retained by the state for costs of administration, shall be turned over to the municipality served by such police officer; and provided further, that in the case of all liquor captured or confiscated by the sheriff, deputy sheriff or constable of any county, the funds derived from the sale of such liquor, less ten percent (10%) to be retained by the state for costs of administration, shall be turned over to the county served by such sheriff, deputy sheriff or constable.

Each sheriff, deputy sheriff or constable of any county or any police officer of any municipality, who has seized and confiscated any intoxicating liquors, shall make an itemized list of such beverages, showing the quantity, brand, name and size of bottle, and shall deliver a signed copy of the itemized list to the commission at the time the beverages are delivered or turned over to the commission for disposal. The agent or representative of the commission receiving the beverages shall likewise issue a receipt to such officer covering the beverages. A copy of the list of beverages prepared by the officer making the seizure and confiscation shall be delivered by the officer to the county mayor of the county if the seizure be made by a county officer, and a copy shall be furnished the mayor of the municipality if the seizure be made by a municipal officer. The commission likewise shall furnish the county mayor with a copy of the list of beverages which it has received from the particular law enforcement officer.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b9; Code 1932, § 11232; Acts 1947, ch. 127, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11232; Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 5, 14; Acts 1959, ch. 301, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1963, ch. 258, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-616; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 15, 22, 28.

57-9-116. Report of sales.

All sales of liquor made as directed in §§57-9-115 —57-9-119 shall be reported to the court in writing, stating the amount disposed of, the prices obtained therefor, and such other information as the court may require. If it shall appear that the sheriff has complied with the order of the court directing the sale, then such report shall be approved and entered on the minutes of the court.

Acts 1947, ch. 127, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11232; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-617.

57-9-117. Disposition of liquor bearing no federal tax stamp — Destruction of spoiled liquor.

Should liquor not having a federal stamp on the bottle or package be captured or taken in possession by officers, then the court shall order such liquor destroyed, or may order it turned over to federal authorities for evidence; and if it should appear that any liquor seized in accordance with this part, though having a federal stamp thereon, is not fit for consumption, the court shall order the same to be destroyed.

Acts 1947, ch. 127, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11232; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-618.

57-9-118. Sheriff's inventory to facilitate credit to proper jurisdiction.

It shall be the duty of the sheriff to keep separate inventories of liquor that is captured by police officers and liquor captured by other officers, so that the funds derived from the sale thereof may be properly divided between the county and incorporated city, town or municipality.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b9; Code 1932, § 11232; Acts 1947, ch. 127, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11232; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-619.

57-9-119. No disposition prior to time for filing claim.

The court shall not order the sale or destruction of any of the liquors seized under this part until the time for filing petitions, alleging ownership thereof or an interest therein, as provided in §57-9-111, shall have elapsed.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b9; Code 1932, § 11232; Acts 1947, ch. 127, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 11232; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-619.

57-9-120. Possession of liquor is prima facie evidence of unlawful transportation, reception, and possession.

In proceedings under this part, the possession of intoxicating liquors, except by persons expressly authorized to transport, receive, or possess the same under the laws of this state, shall be prima facie evidence that such liquors have been transported, received, or possessed in violation of the laws of this state.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b11; Code 1932, § 11234; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-620.

57-9-121. Violation of preceding sections — Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this part is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Any officer violating the provisions of this part shall also forfeit the office and be ineligible to reappointment or reelection to same for a period of five (5) years.

Acts 1919, ch. 50, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 6798a19b15; Code 1932, § 11238; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-621; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.